Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF2299.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: Section 1. Section 261E.8, Code 2026, is amended by adding the following new subsection: NEW SUBSECTION . 10. A studentâs parent or guardian, if the student is a minor, or the student, if the student is eighteen years of age or older or is an emancipated minor, shall, upon the request of the school district or accredited nonpublic school through which the student is accessing the program, pay to the school district or accredited nonpublic school an amount equal to the amount the school district or accredited nonpublic school paid to a community college pursuant to the contract entered into under this section that is directly associated with the studentâs participation in the community college-offered class, or the class taught by a community college-employed instructor, if any one of the following applies: a. The student failed the community college-offered class. b. The student failed the class taught by a community college-employed instructor. c. The student withdrew from the community college-offered class. Senate File 2299, p. 2 d. The student withdrew from the class taught by a community college-employed instructor. ______________________________ AMY SINCLAIR President of the Senate ______________________________ PAT GRASSLEY Speaker of the House I hereby certify that this bill originated in the Senate and is known as Senate File 2299, Ninety-first General Assembly. ______________________________ W. CHARLES SMITHSON Secretary of the Senate Approved _______________, 2026 ______________________________ KIM REYNOLDS Governor